Massachusetts, session 194th, H4702.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: The positions of police lieutenant and police sergeant in the City of
Leominster shall be exempt from Chapter 31 of General Laws.
SECTION 2: This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1